Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. PARKS AND OTHER RECREATIONAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES

SUBTITLE A. MUNICIPAL PARKS AND OTHER RECREATIONAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES

CHAPTER 309. ARTS AND ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICTS

Sec. 309.001. ARTS AND ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICTS. (a) A municipality with a population of more than one million may designate a defined area in the municipality as an arts and entertainment district to develop a public and private collaboration that plays a vital role in the cultural life and development of the community in the district.

(b) The municipality shall develop the area in the district so that it contributes to the public through interpretive, educational, and recreational uses.

(c) The municipality may solicit grants and donations for the development of the district.

(d) The municipality may provide incentives to persons to develop the area in the district for public purposes.

(e) The municipality may provide tax breaks to persons in the district to develop the district for public purposes.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 482 (H.B. 2514), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2007.